Hawaii, session 2026, SB3280.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the existing scope of chapter 229, Hawaii Revised Statutes, needs to be broadened because at present, it focuses largely on sister-state or province partnerships.  The legislature further finds that modern government-to-government work requires the ability to enter into nonbinding memoranda of understanding with national governments or ministries, regional bodies, and other Asia-Pacific partners.  Such an expansion will enable the State to advance in key areas including agriculture, biosecurity, climate resilience, indigenous knowledge, education, renewable energy, and economic development. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Authorize the governor and legislature to enter into nonbinding international cooperative agreements with foreign national governments, foreign subnational jurisdictions, and regional intergovernmental partners; and (2)  Authorize the Hawaii sister-state and international partnerships commission to review proposals for sister-state or province partnerships and international cooperative agreements. SECTION 2.  Chapter 229, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding two new sections to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§229-     Purpose.  The purpose of this chapter is to facilitate Hawaii's engagement in international, regional, and sister-state or province partnerships to support the State's cultural, educational, environmental, and economic goals.  This chapter authorizes the State to enter into sister-state or province partnerships and international cooperative agreements with foreign national governments, foreign subnational jurisdictions, and regional intergovernmental partners. §229-     International cooperative agreements; authorized.  (a) The governor, or the governor's designee, may enter into nonbinding international cooperative agreements with national governments; national ministries, departments, or agencies; provincial or regional governments; or international intergovernmental bodies relevant to the State's interests in Asia and the Pacific. (b) The legislature, through concurrent resolution or by enacting session law to that effect, may enter into nonbinding international cooperative agreements with national governments; national ministries, departments, or agencies; provincial or regional governments; or international intergovernmental bodies relevant to the State's interests in Asia and the Pacific. (c)  Any international cooperative agreement entered into pursuant to subsection (a) or (b): (1)  Shall be nonbinding; (2)  Shall not create legally enforceable obligations; and (3)  Shall not constitute any treaty, alliance, compact, or other agreement that is prohibited by Article I, Section 10, of the United States Constitution." SECTION 3.  Chapter 229, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending its title to read as follows: "INTERNATIONAL RELATIONS; SISTER-STATE [AND] OR PROVINCE [RELATIONSHIPS] PARTNERSHIPS; INTERNATIONAL COOPERATIVE AGREEMENTS" SECTION 4.  Section 229-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  The commission shall support the governor, legislature, and office of international affairs in building and maintaining strategic long-term sister-state or province partnerships and international cooperative agreements that promote and enrich the people, cultures, environments, and economies of the State and its international partners." SECTION 5.  Section 229-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§229-3  Initiating sister-state [relationships.] or province partnerships; proposal review; international cooperative agreements.  (a)  The commission shall evaluate and develop recommendations for the initiation of all sister-state or province partnerships or international cooperative agreements and forward its recommendation to the legislature.  The legislature, if it so chooses, shall implement the recommendation to initiate a sister-state or province partnership or international cooperative agreement by either adopting a concurrent resolution or by enacting session law to that effect. (b)  The commission may review proposals for sister-state or province relationships or international cooperative agreements, including agreements with national governments or ministries, and shall make recommendations to the legislature and governor." SECTION 6.  Section 229-4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending its title to read as follows: "§229-4  Maintaining sister-state [relationships.] or province partnerships." SECTION 7.  Section 229-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending its title to read as follows: "§229-5  Dissolving sister-state [relationships.] or province partnerships." SECTION 8.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 9.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________